Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.080

Order to direct determination of damages and offsetting benefits.

The order shall direct that determination be had of the compensation and damages to be paid all parties interested in the land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated for the taking and appropriation thereof, together with the injury, if any, caused by such taking and appropriation to the remainder of the lands, real estate, premises, or other property from which the same is to be taken and appropriated after offsetting against any and all such compensation and damages the special benefits, if any, accruing to such remainder by reason of the appropriation and the use by the state of the lands, real estate, premises, and other property described in the petition. The determination shall be made within thirty days after the entry of such order, before a jury if trial by jury is demanded at the hearing either by the petitioner or by the respondents, otherwise by the court sitting without a jury. If no regular venire has been called so as to be available to serve within such time on application of the petitioner at the hearing, the court may by its order continue such determination to the next regular jury term if a regular venire will be called within sixty days, otherwise the court shall call a special jury within said sixty days and direct that a jury panel be selected and summoned pursuant to chapter 2.36 RCW, from the citizens of the county in which the lands, real estate, premises, or other property sought to be appropriated are situated, as many qualified persons as may be necessary in order to form a jury of twelve persons, unless the petitioner and respondents both consent to a less number of jurors (such number to be not less than three), and such consent is entered by the clerk in the minutes of such hearing. In any county with a population of less than seventy thousand, the costs of such special jury for the trial of such condemnation cases only shall be borne by the state.

[ 1991 c 363 s 8; 1988 c 188 s 15; 1955 c 213 s 3. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 98 s 1, part; 1891 c 74 s 4, part; RRS s 894, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 47, 48.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.

Juries in courts of limited jurisdiction: RCW 2.36.050.